Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF46.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1091YH (2) 91 as/js H.F. 46 Section 1. Section 80B.11, subsection 1, paragraph b, Code 1 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 b. (1) Minimum basic training requirements law enforcement 3 officers employed after July 1, 1968, must complete in order to 4 remain eligible for continued employment and the time within 5 which such basic training must be completed. 6 (2) Minimum requirements shall mandate training devoted to 7 the topic of domestic abuse and sexual assault. 8 (3) Minimum requirements shall mandate training devoted 9 to the elimination of motorcyclist profiling. Local law 10 enforcement agencies shall add a statement condemning and 11 prohibiting motorcyclist profiling to existing policies 12 regarding profiling. For purposes of this paragraph, 13 âmotorcyclist profilingâ means the illegal use of the fact 14 that a person rides a motorcycle or wears motorcycle-related 15 paraphernalia as a factor in deciding to stop and question, 16 take enforcement action, arrest, or search a person or 17 vehicle with or without a legal basis under the United States 18 Constitution or the Constitution of the State of Iowa. 19 (4) The council shall submit an annual report to the general 20 assembly by January 15 of each year relating to the continuing 21 education requirements devoted to the topic of domestic abuse 22 and motorcyclist profiling , including the number of hours 23 required, the substance of the classes offered, and other 24 related matters. 25 Sec. 2. Section 80B.11, subsection 1, paragraph c, Code 26 2025, is amended by adding the following new subparagraph: 27 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (4) In-service training under this 28 paragraph âcâ shall include the requirement that all law 29 enforcement officers complete a course on motorcyclist 30 profiling, as defined in paragraph âbâ . 31